apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="BASE__nadszołch">
  <e>       <p><l>szoł<b/>żech</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszła<b/>żech</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>szoł<b/>żeś</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszła<b/>żeś</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>szołech</l>   <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>szołch</l>    <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eszłach</l>   <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>szołś</l>     <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eszłaś</l>    <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>szoł</l>      <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszła</l>     <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszło</l>     <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszlimy</l>   <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszliście</l> <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eszlichmy</l> <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eszli<b/>żeście</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszli</l>     <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłymy</l>   <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłyście</l> <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eszłychmy</l> <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eszły<b/>żeście</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszły</l>     <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>szołbych</l>  <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłabych</l> <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>szołbyś</l>   <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłabyś</l>  <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>szołby</l>    <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłaby</l>   <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłoby</l>   <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszlibymy</l> <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszlibyście</l><r><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszliby</l>   <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłybymy</l> <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłybyście</l><r><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eszłyby</l>   <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="BASE__robi">
  <e>       <p><l>sz</l>        <r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cie</l>       <r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="BASE__czytŏ">
  <e>       <p><l>ŏsz</l>       <r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŏ</l>         <r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōmy</l>       <r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŏcie</l>      <r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/być__vbser">
  <e>       <p><l>być</l>       <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <!-- Present -->
  <e>       <p><l>je<b/>żech</l><r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>je<b/>żeś</l> <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>je</l>        <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sōm</l>       <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sōm<b/>żeście</l><r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sōm</l>       <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>b</l>         <r>być<s n="vbser"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robiōłch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydã</l>      <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydziesz</l>  <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydzie</l>    <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydymy</l>    <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydziecie</l> <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydōm</l>     <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydź</l>      <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydźmy</l>    <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydźcie</l>   <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydź<b/>to</l><r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydźmy<b/>to</l><r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydźcie<b/>to</l><r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydōc</l>     <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bydōnc</l>    <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>by</l>        <r>być<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__żywobycie"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="niyma__vbser">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="trza__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vaux"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/ōc__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l>ōc</l>        <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogã</l>       <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oże</l>       <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogymy</l>     <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogōm</l>      <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__mogłech"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōgby</l>      <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogōnc</l>     <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogōnc</l>     <r>ōc<s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="idzie">           <i>idzie</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="bydzie szło">     <i>bydzie<b/>szło</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="szło">            <i>szło</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="mōc">             <i>m</i><par n="m/ōc__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="snamno">          <i>snamno</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="słychać">         <i>słychać</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="trza">            <i>trza</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="potrza">          <i>potrza</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="widać">           <i>widać</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="wieda">           <i>wieda</i><par n="trza__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="być">             <i></i><par n="/być__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="niyma">           <i>niyma</i><par n="niyma__vbser"/></e>
